District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.01

Board of directors.

(a)

A limited cooperative association shall have a board of directors of at least 3 individuals, unless the association has fewer than 3 members. If the association has fewer than 3 members, the number of directors shall not be fewer than the number of members.

(b)

The affairs of a limited cooperative association shall be managed by, or under the direction of, the board of directors. The board may adopt policies and procedures that do not conflict with the organic rules or this chapter.

(c)

An individual shall not be an agent for a limited cooperative association solely by being a director.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 801 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition